Utah statutes.
9-4-705.   Activities authorized to receive fund money -- Powers of the
executive director.
At the direction of the board, the executive director may:
(1)  provide fund money to any of the following activities:
(a)  acquisition, rehabilitation, or new construction of low-income housing
units;
(b)  matching funds for social services projects directly related to providing
housing for special-need renters in assisted projects;
(c)  the development and construction of accessible housing designed for low-
income persons;
(d)  shelters and transitional housing for the homeless; and
(e)  other activities that will assist in improving the availability or
quality of housing in the state for low-income persons;
(2)  do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted
by this part or reasonably implied therefrom including:
(a)  making or executing contracts and other instruments necessary or
convenient for the performance of the executive director and board's duties
and the exercise of the executive director and board's powers and functions
under this part, including contracts or agreements for the servicing and
originating of mortgage loans;
(b)  procuring insurance against any loss in connection with property or other
assets held by the fund, including mortgage loans, in amounts and from
insurers it considers desirable;
(c)  entering into agreements with any department, agency, or instrumentality
of the United States or this state and with mortgagors and mortgage lenders
for the purpose of planning and regulating and providing for the financing and
refinancing, purchase, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, leasing,
management, maintenance, operation, sale, or other disposition of any
residential housing undertaken with the assistance of the department under
this part;
(d)  proceeding with a foreclosure action, to own, lease, clear, reconstruct,
rehabilitate, repair, maintain, manage, operate, assign, encumber, sell, or
otherwise dispose of any real or personal property obtained by the fund due to
the default on any mortgage loan held by the fund in preparation for
disposition of the property, taking assignments of leases and rentals,
proceeding with foreclosure actions, and taking other actions necessary or
incidental to the performance of its duties; and
(e)  selling, at a public or private sale, with public bidding, any mortgage
or other obligation held by the fund.
